Illinois, session 104th, HB1107.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 514-9.05 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/14-9.05 new)7    Sec. 14-9.05. Training to reduce unconscious bias and 8stigmatization of children with disabilities. 9    (a) The General Assembly makes all of the following 10findings:11        (1) Unconscious bias, preconceived notions, and 12    stigmatizing assumptions about individuals with 13    disabilities, including those with autism spectrum 14    disorders and behavioral disorders, influence evaluations, 15    interactions, and decisions regarding those who are the 16    subject of the bias.17        (2) A "presume competence" attitude is essential to 18    fostering equitable and inclusive educational environments 19    for children with disabilities, including those with 20    autism spectrum disorders and behavioral disorders.21        (3) Students with autism spectrum disorders and 22    behavioral disorders, like all students, benefit from 23    having access to educators who actively work to reduce   HB1107- 2 -LRB104 04493 LNS 14520 b1    biases, challenge stigmatizing assumptions, and recognize 2    potential and capabilities.3        (4) Training that helps educators overcome unconscious 4    bias, reduce stigmatization, and address behavioral 5    challenges has implications for classroom interactions, 6    individualized education program planning, equitable 7    access to resources, and fostering positive academic 8    self-concepts.9        (5) Effective classroom strategies for reducing 10    unwanted behaviors and reinforcing desired behaviors are 11    critical to creating a positive learning environment for 12    children with disabilities.13        (6) Communication and engagement are essential for the 14    success of students with autism spectrum disorders and 15    behavior disorders, and educators need tools and methods 16    to support those areas effectively.17        (7) Parents and guardians of children with 18    disabilities provide critical insight into their 19    children's strengths, needs, and challenges and should 20    have meaningful opportunities to contribute to the 21    development and implementation of strategies that support 22    their children's education.23    (b) As used in this Section, "stigmatizing assumptions" 24and "unconscious bias" mean preferences, positive or negative, 25or unexamined attitudes regarding individuals with 26disabilities, including those with autism spectrum disorders   HB1107- 3 -LRB104 04493 LNS 14520 b1and behavioral disorders, that operate outside of awareness 2and that may have cognitive, affective, and behavioral 3components and contribute to lowered expectations and 4educational inequities.5    (c) Teachers, administrators, and school support personnel 6shall complete training to develop cultural competency, 7including understanding and reducing unconscious bias and 8stigmatizing assumptions about persons with disabilities, as 9outlined in Sections 3-11 and 10-22.39. This training must 10include all of the following:11        (1) Recognition of unconscious bias, assumptive 12    attitudes, and systemic stigmatization of disabilities, 13    particularly autism spectrum disorders and behavioral 14    disorders, and how these manifest in classroom 15    interactions, evaluations, and decisions.16        (2) Strategies to promote a "presume competence" 17    mindset that affirms the potential of every student, 18    including those with autism spectrum disorders and 19    behavioral disorders, and challenges stereotypes.20        (3) Classroom strategies to reduce unwanted behaviors 21    and reinforce desired behaviors, including positive 22    reinforcement techniques, clear expectations, and 23    structured support to promote a positive and productive 24    learning environment.25        (4) Methods for supporting communication and 26    engagement for students with autism spectrum disorders,   HB1107- 4 -LRB104 04493 LNS 14520 b1    including the use of alternative communication systems, 2    visual supports, and social skills training.3        (5) Education on the rights of children with 4    disabilities under the federal Individuals with 5    Disabilities Education Act, Section 504 of the federal 6    Rehabilitation Act of 1973, and the federal Americans with 7    Disabilities Act of 1990.8        (6) Tools for fostering positive classroom 9    environments that affirm the dignity, capability, and 10    individuality of children with disabilities, including 11    strategies for social and emotional learning.12        (7) Opportunities and avenues for educators to receive 13    input from parents and guardians of children with 14    disabilities and others with experience in dealing with 15    these disabilities. This may include sharing the 16    experience of caring for a child with a disability and the 17    successful strategies they incorporate in the home 18    environment.19    Additionally, the training may include medical or other 20professionals who may offer valuable information and training 21for educators in better understanding the impact of a 22disability and methods that may help inform the educator. 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 242025.